Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 15. Electricians and Electrical Installations

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, provided that section 3 of the act, which added this chapter, was to take effect when the Electricians’ Licensing Board adopted regulations under

26 V.S.A. § 891

, as enacted, at which time any regulations adopted under authority of the statutory provisions deleted under section 3 of the act were to terminate.